Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-232
Hunt, defined.

Hunt means to pursue, shoot, catch, capture, collect, harvest, kill, destroy, or attempt to pursue, shoot, catch, capture, collect, harvest, kill, or destroy.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 42.